Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [84.0912] PROTECTING WILD RICE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Findings. new text end new text begin The legislature finds that uncultivated wild rice: new text end new text begin (1) is a nutrient-rich, natural food source that has been sustainably harvested in this state for centuries; new text end new text begin (2) is sacred to many Indigenous people and is a core component of their cultural identity; new text end new text begin (3) thrives in clean, shallow water, without requiring pesticides, fertilizers, or harmful chemicals; new text end new text begin (4) supports rural economies by providing jobs, fostering local businesses, and supporting ecotourism; new text end new text begin (5) plays a crucial role in preventing toxic algae blooms, absorbing carbon dioxide, fostering vital habitat for fish, and stabilizing lake beds; and new text end new text begin (6) is essential for safeguarding Tribal food security and upholding Tribal treaty rights. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Agency" means a department, agency, board, commission, or other group in the executive branch of state government; a statutory or home rule charter city, county, or town; any metropolitan agency or regional entity; and any other political subdivision of the state. new text end new text begin (c) "Wild rice risk justification" means a document that quantifies and justifies the potential risk of adverse effects to wild rice waters and that meets the requirements of subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) "Wild rice water" means any body of water: new text end new text begin (1) identified as supporting, or capable of supporting, wild rice on any list, inventory, or map maintained by the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency or the Department of Natural Resources; new text end new text begin (2) that lies within, or abuts and flows into, Indian country, as that term is defined in United States Code, title 18, section 1151; or new text end new text begin (3) identified using the appropriation in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 1, article 2, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (z), as a water in which uncultivated wild rice grows. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Authorizing activities affecting wild rice. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an agency may not issue a permit, license, or other approval for an activity or facility in a wild rice water, or at a location likely to adversely affect a wild rice water, unless the agency prepares a wild rice risk justification that meets the requirements of subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Wild rice risk justification requirements. new text end new text begin A wild rice risk justification must include at least the following: new text end new text begin (1) identification and a detailed description of all wild rice waters potentially threatened by the activity or facility proposed to be permitted, licensed, or approved; new text end new text begin (2) identification of all scenarios that might pose a risk to the wild rice waters identified under clause (1), the likelihood of each scenario unfolding, and the scale of damage to wild rice waters that would likely result from each scenario; and new text end new text begin (3) an explanation of how the public need for the proposed activity or facility justifies the risk posed by the activity or facility to wild rice waters. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Public comment and review; Tribal consultation; posting. new text end new text begin (a) The agency must provide a draft wild rice risk justification for public comment. The agency must accept comments for at least 30 days. Before issuing a final decision on the permit, license, or other approval, the agency must respond in writing to all substantive comments. If 100 or more residents or property owners in the state of Minnesota request a public hearing in writing during the comment period, the agency must hold a public hearing near the affected wild rice water. new text end new text begin (b) The agency must also provide a copy of the draft wild rice risk justification to Minnesota Tribal governments, as defined under section 10.65, and must engage in section 10.65 consultation concerning the draft wild rice risk justification with any Minnesota Tribal government that requests it. new text end new text begin (c) The agency must publish a final wild rice risk justification in the State Register and post it on the agency's website. The publication of the final wild rice risk justification in the State Register constitutes issuance of a final wild rice risk justification and is a final agency decision under section 115.05, subdivision 11. new text end